ext-firefox-thunderbird-seamonkey/british-english-dictionary-darmeth/dictionaries/en-GB.aff
SFX Q Y 44
SFX Q 0 tise a
SFX Q e ise [^l]e
SFX Q le ilise [^aeiou]le
SFX Q e ise [aeiou]le
SFX Q um ise um
SFX Q 0 ise [^u]m
SFX Q s se is
SFX Q 0 ise [^i]s
SFX Q y ise [^aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ise [aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ise [^aemsy]
SFX Q 0 tises a
SFX Q e ises [^l]e
SFX Q le ilises [^aeiou]le
SFX Q e ises [aeiou]le
SFX Q um ises um
SFX Q 0 ises [^u]m
SFX Q s ses is
SFX Q 0 ises [^i]s
SFX Q y ises [^aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ises [aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ises [^aemsy]
SFX Q 0 tised a
SFX Q e ised [^l]e
SFX Q le ilised [^aeiou]le
SFX Q e ised [aeiou]le
SFX Q um ised um
SFX Q 0 ised [^u]m
SFX Q s sed is
SFX Q 0 ised [^i]s
SFX Q y ised [^aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ised [aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ised [^aemsy]
SFX Q 0 tising a
SFX Q e ising [^l]e
SFX Q le ilising [^aeiou]le
SFX Q e ising [aeiou]le
SFX Q um ising um
SFX Q 0 ising [^u]m
SFX Q s sing is
SFX Q 0 ising [^i]s
SFX Q y ising [^aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ising [aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ising [^aemsy]
SFX 8 Y 4
SFX 8 s ze is
SFX 8 s zes is
SFX 8 s zed is
SFX 8 s zing is
SFX q Y 22
SFX q 0 tisation a
SFX q e isation [^l]e
SFX q le ilisation [^aeiou]le
SFX q e isation [aeiou]le
SFX q um isation um
SFX q 0 isation [^u]m
SFX q s sation is
SFX q 0 isation [^i]s
SFX q y isation [^aeiou]y
SFX q 0 isation [aeiou]y
SFX q 0 isation [^aemsy]
SFX q 0 tisations a
SFX q e isations [^l]e
SFX q le ilisations [^aeiou]le
SFX q e isations [aeiou]le
SFX q um isations um
SFX q 0 isations [^u]m
SFX q s sations is
SFX q 0 isations [^i]s
SFX q y isations [^aeiou]y
SFX q 0 isations [aeiou]y
SFX q 0 isations [^aemsy]
SFX s Y 33
SFX s 0 tiser a
SFX s e iser [^l]e
SFX s le iliser [^aeiou]le
SFX s e iser [aeiou]le
SFX s um iser um
SFX s 0 iser [^u]m
SFX s s ser is
SFX s 0 iser [^i]s
SFX s y iser [^aeiou]y
SFX s 0 iser [aeiou]y
SFX s 0 iser [^aemsy]
SFX s 0 tisers a
SFX s e isers [^l]e
SFX s le ilisers [^aeiou]le
SFX s e isers [aeiou]le
SFX s um isers um
SFX s 0 isers [^u]m
SFX s s sers is
SFX s 0 isers [^i]s
SFX s y isers [^aeiou]y
SFX s 0 isers [aeiou]y
SFX s 0 isers [^aemsy]
SFX s 0 tiser's a
SFX s e iser's [^l]e
SFX s le iliser's [^aeiou]le
SFX s e iser's [aeiou]le
SFX s um iser's um
SFX s 0 iser's [^u]m
SFX s s ser's is
SFX s 0 iser's [^i]s
SFX s y iser's [^aeiou]y
SFX s 0 iser's [aeiou]y
SFX s 0 iser's [^aemsy]
SFX 9 Y 3
SFX 9 s zer is
SFX 9 s zers is
SFX 9 s zer's is
SFX t Y 22
SFX t 0 tisable a
SFX t e isable [^l]e
SFX t le ilisable [^aeiou]le
SFX t e isable [aeiou]le
SFX t um isable um
SFX t 0 isable [^u]m
SFX t s sable is
SFX t 0 isable [^i]s
SFX t y isable [^aeiou]y
SFX t 0 isable [aeiou]y
SFX t 0 isable [^aemsy]
SFX t 0 tisability a
SFX t e isability [^l]e
SFX t le ilisability [^aeiou]le
SFX t e isability [aeiou]le
SFX t um isability um
SFX t 0 isability [^u]m
SFX t s sability is
SFX t 0 isability [^i]s
SFX t y isability [^aeiou]y
SFX t 0 isability [aeiou]y
SFX t 0 isability [^aemsy]
SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 's .
SFX B Y 46
SFX B e able [^acegilotu]e
SFX B 0 able [acegilou]e
SFX B te ble ate
SFX B e able [^a]te
SFX B 0 bable [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX B 0 dable [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX B 0 fable [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX B 0 gable [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX B 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX B 0 mable [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX B 0 nable [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX B 0 pable [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX B 0 rable [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX B 0 sable [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX B 0 table [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX B 0 vable [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX B 0 able [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX B 0 able [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX B y iable [^aeiou]y
SFX B 0 able [aeiou]y
SFX B 0 able [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy]
SFX B e ability [^acegilotu]e
SFX B 0 ability [acegilou]e
SFX B te bility ate
SFX B e ability [^a]te
SFX B 0 bability [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX B 0 dability [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX B 0 fability [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX B 0 gability [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX B 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX B 0 mability [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX B 0 nability [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX B 0 pability [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX B 0 rability [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX B 0 sability [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX B 0 tability [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX B 0 vability [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX B 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX B 0 ability [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX B y iability [^aeiou]y
SFX B 0 ability [aeiou]y
SFX B 0 ability [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy]
SFX 7 Y 9
SFX 7 e able [acegilou]e
SFX 7 0 able [^acegilou]e
SFX 7 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 7 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 7 0 able [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 7 0 able [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 7 y iable [^aeiou]y
SFX 7 0 able [aeiou]y
SFX 7 0 able [^cely]
SFX g Y 9
SFX g e ability [^acegilou]e
SFX g 0 ability [acegilou]e
SFX g 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX g 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX g 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX g 0 ability [^aeiou][cl]
SFX g y iability [^aeiou]y
SFX g 0 ability [aeiou]y
SFX g 0 ability [^cely]
SFX l Y 9
SFX l e ably [^acegilou]e
SFX l 0 ably [acegilou]e
SFX l 0 kably [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX l 0 lably [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX l 0 ably [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX l 0 ably [^aeiou][cl]
SFX l y iably [^aeiou]y
SFX l 0 ably [aeiou]y
SFX l 0 ably [^cely]
SFX b Y 3
SFX b e ible [^aeiou]e
SFX b 0 ible [aeiou]e
SFX b 0 ible [^e]
SFX L Y 12
SFX L 0 ament m
SFX L y iment [^aeiou]y
SFX L 0 ment [aeiou]y
SFX L 0 ment [^my]
SFX L 0 aments m
SFX L y iments [^aeiou]y
SFX L 0 ments [aeiou]y
SFX L 0 ments [^my]
SFX L 0 ament's m
SFX L y iment's [^aeiou]y
SFX L 0 ment's [aeiou]y
SFX L 0 ment's [^my]
SFX Z Y 30
SFX Z ic y dic
SFX Z e y [^aeiouy]e
SFX Z 0 y [aeiouy]e
SFX Z 0 ey [aiouy]
SFX Z 0 by [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX Z 0 ky [^adeio][aeiou]c
SFX Z 0 dy [^aegio][aeiou]d
SFX Z 0 fy [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX Z 0 gy [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX Z 0 ky [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX Z 0 ly [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX Z 0 my [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX Z 0 ny [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX Z 0 py [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX Z 0 ry [^aegilost][aiou]r
SFX Z 0 ry lur
SFX Z 0 ry tar
SFX Z 0 y [^aceiglmopt][a]r
SFX Z 0 y [gl][a]r
SFX Z 0 y [st]or
SFX Z 0 y ged
SFX Z 0 sy [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX Z 0 ty [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX Z 0 vy [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX Z 0 zy [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX Z 0 y [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX Z 0 y [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprtvz]
SFX Z 0 y [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX Z 0 y [^aebcdfgiklmnoprstuvyz]
SFX Z 0 ity ous
SFX 2 Y 21
SFX 2 e iness [^aeiouy]e
SFX 2 0 iness [aeiouy]e
SFX 2 0 biness [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 2 0 diness [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 2 0 finess [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 2 0 giness [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 2 0 liness [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 2 0 miness [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 2 0 niness [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 2 0 piness [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 2 0 riness [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 2 0 siness [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 2 0 tiness [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX 2 0 viness [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 2 0 ziness [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 2 0 iness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 0 iness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX z Y 24
SFX z e ily [^aeiouy]e
SFX z 0 ily [aeiouy]e
SFX z 0 ily [aiou]y
SFX z ey ily ey
SFX z y ily [^aeiou]y
SFX z 0 bily [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX z 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX z 0 dily [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX z 0 fily [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX z 0 gily [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX z 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX z 0 lily [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX z 0 mily [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX z 0 nily [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX z 0 pily [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX z 0 rily [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX z 0 sily [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX z 0 tily [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX z 0 vily [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX z 0 zily [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX z 0 ily [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX z 0 ily [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX z 0 ily [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX z 0 ily [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX y Y 15
SFX y e ory te
SFX y e atory [mr]e
SFX y e ary se
SFX y 0 ry [^mrst]e
SFX y 0 ory [^aeous]t
SFX y 0 ry [aeous]t
SFX y 0 ery h
SFX y 0 atory [^i]m
SFX y im matory im
SFX y 0 ory s
SFX y 0 ary ion
SFX y 0 ry [^i]on
SFX y 0 nery [aiu]n
SFX y 0 ry [^aiou]n
SFX y 0 ry [^ehmstn]
