ext-firefox-thunderbird-seamonkey/british-english-dictionary-darmeth/dictionaries/en-GB.dic
accompany/3LGDS
account/MBDGlSJ
adduce/bSDNVG
adjust/ALDGS
admire/lNXRSDOGk
adopt/SBRGD
adsorb/BDGSNV
advert/GQMDSs
advertise/L
adv/sQt
afford/GlBSD
agree/ELdSGBl
ai/y
allot/LDGS
alter/dS7lVg
altimeter/SM
amen/gl7
American/QSM
amortise/nSDLNG
annul/SLGD
answer/dM7S
apology/3QMS
appoint/ALGEDS
approach/BGSDM
approbate/Ny
assimilate/XVNGyBSD
astronaut/1SwMW
atom/sQMS
attach/L7GDS
attain/SlBDG
attempt/DMG7S
avoid/Dl7SG
aw/GDyj6
bag/RMSZD62Gz
Balkan/QMS
bawd/Zz2y
b/bp
Beauden/M
believe/BRSDlG
bigot/MyS
bill/7YSGMDJ
blab/ZSDG
blur/Z2DzGhS
Bonnyrigg/M
braver/Z
brine/2GZ
bulk/GzDZS2
cajole/ySDG
Calem/M
canal/DQMqSG
cannibal/QqSM
category/MQSq1w
Cath/MOZ
cession/AyF
chalk/2DGZS
chart/JG7pSMD
chat/S2GzDZ
Chirat/M
chirp/ZS2GzD
chop/2RDZSGz
chunk/DM2GzZS
circular/SQMY
circulate/yNGXSD
cloud/2pMDZSzG
cognise/ASDlG
collapse/b
collective/3QSYMq
colon/3sQSqWM
commend/nl7
commensurate/BIY
commit/DXSLGoN
commonsense/wb
commune/qM3QGoSDO
companion/MS7l
compare/vlVuB
complement/sNSGD
confection/RSy
conservator/SZ
consign/N7L
construct/SGVMuDbv
contextual/Qq
contract/GDbV
convert/SRDMbG
corn/ZS2RGzDM
corolla/MSy
cover/pdJ7
Craigie/M
crank/2GzZSDM
cred/b
credit/El7Sd
criminal/YMQS
crotchet/ZS2M
cru/Qs
crust/ZS2MDGz
cultivate/GNSDBn
cursor/KZSM
damn/DSl7GNk
deacon/SyM
deduct/b
deface/L
defray/7
de/JtG
delectate/BN
departmental/Qq
deplore/GlkSD
deposit/yM
desire/MBl
destruct/buSVGvD
détente/MS
develop/rL7dS
digest/vVGbSD
dilate/VNGygSD
dirt/2MZz
discern/DS7Gbk
discuss/7bXN
dishonour/7l
dispense/yGBDS
displace/L
distiller/Z
distract/hDkVGb
do/GzR7MyJ
dollar/MQS
dot/MdZS2GzkD
drip/DGzMZS2
dupe/Sy
dusk/ZzM2
dust/ZS2RpGzMD
Edgar/MS
embody/LSDG
emend/n7
employ/LRGBSD
energy/MQS
engage/LSDGk
enjoy/Sl7GD
entertain/RLkGDS
enthrone/qDSG
equal/sGQDMqYS
erupt/DVGSb
escalate/XDSyNG
escarp/L
ethic/QS
exception/Sl7M
exclude/uBXDSvGNVb
expansion/y
expend/BSuGVvD
extenuate/GNySD
exterior/QqMYS
external/qQS
extract/bGVBSMD
Fakhr/MZ
fancy/G7YTSD6Rj
farad/qQW
farming/M
fashion/l7DMGS
fertile/QsYq
fetish/SQ
fictional/Qq
filter/Nd7MgS
fish/Z72GyMSD
flash/MSDZzG2J
flirt/XGNZSD
foam/ZSGp2MD
ford/7GMDS
formulary/qQ
fractional/QY
frisk/Gz2ZSD
fur/SGD2pMZ
fuse/bINGXSD
fuzz/Z2Dz
Gaisford/M
Garr/MZ
gawk/ZSGzD2
Gerber/yM
gourmand/QMS
grad/Sn7gd
graveyard/SM
grease/G2SDZp
gristle/2
grouch/zGMDS2Z
habit/n7lgSM
hair/DMZS2p
harmony/qMQS1W
harvest/RSG7MD
hatch/MSDgyG
Heatley/M
heave/ZGDS2
heft/ZSGz2D
hoar/2Z
hora/yO
human/QYqMS3
hybrid/QMqS
Hy/M
iff/Z
immobile/sq
immortal/Q3q
immune/qQ
impasse/B
imperfect/Vg
impress/ubNVXv
improve/BlsQqR
incur/DgG7l
indict/GDL7S
induce/GnvLNVSDub
industrial/q3QS
in/gM
inhabit/7d
initiate/SDyVNGX
innumerate/B
intellectual/QqYMS
internal/qSQ
interrupt/bSVGD
involve/GDSL
irritate/NGBkDSX
itch/GZ2MDS
item/MqQS
Jeannette/M
Jeff/ZSyM
Kelce/M
kink/DMZS2Gz
knowledge/Ml
kook/2ZS
Lacaze/M
learn/i7RGSDh
lection/y
leg/poXbDMOZSJN
lime/DSMGZ
lion/QMqS
liquid/MYSnsQ
LLP/SM
love/kl7pMYRGDS
lump/MD2ZSG
magnet/Q1qSMW
manoeuvre/JGMSDB
Maoism/M
maxilla/yS
me/Ms
metronome/MS
microwave/SD7MG
might/Z2z
military/qMQYS
mineral/MQS
modern/YMQqS
modest/YZI
modify/nRSDBGN
moisture/sQMS
move/LSM7
natural/3QSq
neutral/SQqY
noise/ZM2p
nosebag/MS
objection/l7SM
oppose/BGNXSD
organ/1qWMSsQ3
outlaw/yDG
overstate/L
palate/MSlg
pardon/dMSl7
patch/SDM2ZGz
pauper/qQMS
percept/uvboV
person/l7oSOM
Polaroid/MS
popular/QqY
po/QY
poss/bS
practice/DSMG7
predict/DBGVlS
presume/XvDSVNlG
procure/GDSL
produce/RnvbGMDSVN
propitiate/yGNSD
pulp/G2ZSD
quake/GMDSZ
question/RMDJk7lGS
read/GzRZBJl2
recover/gd7Z
recruit/LSrdM
recycle/7R
reimburse/GLSD
renew/l7ODG
replay/B
resist/VGDvSb
retire/kL
rifle/DSGyM
rise/JbSMG
risk/2ZSDMGz
ritual/QSMY
r/Ods
Rosehill/M
sanity/sQM
sati/7N
schmalz/Z
scrap/2SzGrdDZM
secular/YQq
show/2GzDMZSJ
Siar/M
sis/SZ8
size/7lM
skin/D6pSG2ZM
smear/ZSMDG
snot/Sz2MZ
soap/2ZSGMD
social/Q3qYS
squeak/zG2DMZS
stabile/Qqs
stealth/z2Z
sterile/sqQ
stick/RM2gZSzG
stigma/qWQS1
st/NBlnMJG
stodge/2GZSD
stonemason/yS
su/gGDZ
suit/Mdl7Sg
sulk/GzZS2DM
sustain/lBRGSD
synchrony/qQW1
tang/ZSbM
Tanut/M
terror/MQ3qS
testa/SLM
thrift/SZpMz2
tooth/pzDMZ
total/QsDMSG
tranquilly/sQ
transfer/S7DgG
transport/BNn
understand/k7l
vandal/MQS
Vengsarkar/M
verify/GnSDlBN
viol/3BSM
volatile/qS
volume/sQSM
weight/2MDpJSZzG
willow/MSZ
wizard/SMyY
woman/MYsQp
Zaim/M
